Illinois, session 104th, HB1081.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 12-21.22 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/12-21.22 new)7    Sec. 12-21.22. Therapeutic recreation waiver services for 8persons with developmental disabilities using self-directed 9services. The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, in 10consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall 11submit the necessary application to the federal Centers for 12Medicare and Medicaid Services to amend the Support Waiver for 13Children and Young Adults with Developmental Disabilities and 14the Adults with Developmental Disabilities Waiver to include a 15therapeutic recreation service for individuals using the 16self-directed service model known as Home Based Services. As 17used in this Section, "therapeutic recreation" means 18activity-based interventions to address the needs of 19individuals with disabilities and promote psychological and 20physical health, recovery, and well-being. Therapeutic 21recreation may include using a variety of techniques that 22include arts and crafts, sports, games, drama, music, and 23community outings.